Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1037
Board of state canvassers; members; duties.

There shall be a board of state canvassers consisting of the Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, and Attorney General. The board of state canvassers shall meet at a location designated by the Secretary of State on the fourth Monday after each statewide primary and general election for the sole purpose of canvassing the votes cast for all officers and issues certified to the election commissioner or county clerk by the Secretary of State. The board of state canvassers may adjourn from day to day until all returns are received and all votes are tabulated. The Governor on the advice of the Secretary of State or the Attorney General may call an extraordinary session of the board of state canvassers. The duty of the board of state canvassers to canvass the votes is ministerial in nature.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 331;

Laws 1999, LB 60, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB575, § 26;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 71.

Board of state canvassers meets on the third Monday after election. State ex rel. Caldwell v. Peterson, 153 Neb. 402, 45 N.W.2d 122 (1950).

This statute is unconstitutional as relates to requirements for independent candidates for President and Vice President of United States. MacBride v. Exon, 558 F.2d 443 (8th Cir. 1977).

Although Nebraska's statutes unconstitutionally deny an independent candidate access to appear on the ballot in presidential elections, the court directed the independent be included upon a determination he was a serious candidate, truly independent, with a satisfactory level of community support. McCarthy v. Exon, 424 F.Supp. 1143 (D. Neb. 1976).